California, session 20252026, SB892.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 66025.8 of the Education Code is amended to read:66025.8. (a) The California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to any member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States, and who is a resident of California, who has received an honorable discharge, a general discharge, or an other than honorable discharge, and to any member or former member of the State Guard, for any academic term attended at one of these institutions for four academic years after the member has left state or federal active duty, which the member shall use within 15 years of leaving state or federal active duty.(b) A former member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the State Guard who received a dishonorable discharge or a bad conduct discharge is not eligible for priority registration for enrollment pursuant to this section.(c) The priority registration for enrollment provided pursuant to this section shall apply to enrollment for all degree and certificate programs offered by the institution after the military or veteran status of the student has been verified by the institution the student attends.(d) Students who receive priority registration for enrollment pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 78212.(e) (1) For the purposes of this section, “Armed Forces of the United States” means the Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, National Guard, Naval Militia, Navy, Space Force, and the reserve components of each of those forces, including the California National Guard.(2) As used in this section, “member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States” includes, but is not limited to, any student who is called to active military duty compelling that student to take an academic leave of absence.(f) This section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2027, and, as of January 1, 2028, is repealed.SEC. 2. Section 66025.8 is added to the Education Code, to read:66025.8. (a) The California State University and each community college district shall, and the University of California is requested to, with respect to each campus in their respective jurisdictions that administers a priority enrollment system, grant priority in that system for registration for enrollment to any member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States, and who is a resident of California, who has received an honorable discharge, a general discharge, or an other than honorable discharge, and to any member or former member of the State Guard, for any academic term attended at one of these institutions.(b) A former member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the State Guard who received a dishonorable discharge or a bad conduct discharge is not eligible for priority registration for enrollment pursuant to this section.(c) The priority registration for enrollment provided pursuant to this section shall apply to enrollment for all degree and certificate programs offered by the institution after the military or veteran status of the student has been verified by the institution the student attends.(d) Students who receive priority registration for enrollment pursuant to this section shall comply with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 78212.(e) (1) For purposes of this section, “Armed Forces of the United States” means the Air Force, Army, Coast Guard, Marine Corps, National Guard, Naval Militia, Navy, Space Force, and the reserve components of each of those forces, including the California National Guard, the California Naval Militia, and the California State Guard, and the California Naval Militia. Guard.(2) As used in this section, “member or former member of the Armed Forces of the United States” includes, but is not limited to, any student who is called to active military duty compelling that student to take an academic leave of absence.(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2027.SEC. 3. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Lines 2 and 4.___________________